District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.34

Fares; structure; purpose.

(a)

Insofar as practicable, and consistent with the provision of adequate service at reasonable fares, the rates and fares and service shall be fixed by the Department, so as to result in revenues that shall:

(1)

Pay the operating expenses and provide for repairs, maintenance, and depreciation of the DC Circulator vehicles or other assets owned or controlled by the District;

(2)

Provide for payment of all principal and interest on outstanding revenue bonds; and

(3)

Provide funds for any purpose the Department considers necessary and desirable to carry out the purposes of this section.

(b)

Nothing in subsection (a) of this section shall prevent the Department from offering tickets at no cost or at discounted prices as part of the Department’s marketing of the DC Circulator.

(c)

Beginning August 26, 2013, the Department shall not charge a DC Circulator fare to students on regular school days.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11d
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-225, § 3(e), 53 DCR 10232
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 10004, 60 DCR 12472
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 added (c).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(d) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-134, June 16, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5762).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(d) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-321, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2557).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(e) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-3, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1439).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 10004 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 10004 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 10001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Title X of the act may be cited as the “Revised Revenue Estimate Adjustment Allocation Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.